Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF18.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1320YH (1) 91 je/js H.F. 18 Section 1. Section 96.3, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 1 following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 5A. Diminished salary offset. If an 3 individual receiving benefits accepts an offer of employment 4 prior to the exhausting of all benefits for the individualâs 5 benefit year and the gross weekly salary is less than the 6 individualâs weekly benefit amount, the individual shall be 7 eligible to receive an amount equal to the difference between 8 the individualâs gross weekly salary and the individualâs 9 weekly benefit amount. Benefits shall be exhausted when the 10 individualâs gross weekly salary paid plus benefits received 11 equal or are greater than the maximum total amount of benefits 12 payable to the individual during the benefit year. 13